public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG num
SFX A eplikar èpliko/IJ replikar
SFX A epolar èpola/EGQ pepolar
SFX A epolar èpole/HIJQ pepolar
SFX A epolar èpolelo/R pepolar
SFX A epolar èpoli/M pepolar
SFX A epolar èpolitu/N pepolar
SFX A epolar èpolo/IJ pepolar
SFX A epolar épola/EGQ skrepolar
SFX A epolar épole/HIJQ skrepolar
SFX A epolar épolelo/R skrepolar
SFX A epolar époli/M skrepolar
SFX A epolar épolitu/N skrepolar
SFX A epolar épolo/IJ skrepolar
SFX A eputar éputa/EGQ [dr]eputar
SFX A eputar épute/HIJQ [dr]eputar
SFX A eputar éputelo/R [dr]eputar
SFX A eputar éputi/M [dr]eputar
SFX A eputar éputitu/N [dr]eputar
SFX A eputar éputo/IJ [dr]eputar
SFX A er a [ar]kòjer
SFX A er a [er]maner
SFX A er a [kps]òrxer
SFX A er a [luèò]der
SFX A er a [lè]xer
SFX A er a [rtxđ]èmer
SFX A er a [rèò]ter
SFX A er a [sx]òlver
SFX A er a [èò]rder
SFX A er a [èò]ñer
SFX A er a abòrer
SFX A er a espèler
SFX A er a koñer
SFX A er a kòxer
SFX A er a lèđer
SFX A er a lđer
SFX A er a mòjer
SFX A er a mòver
SFX A er a nòxer
SFX A er a parer
SFX A er a piòver
SFX A er a rver
SFX A er a rđer
SFX A er a soler
SFX A er a sèguer
SFX A er a sòrber
SFX A er a tràer
SFX A er a tèser
SFX A er a valer
SFX A er a xlièđer
SFX A er a òser
SFX A er a ŧèrner
SFX A er e/HIJQ [ar]kòjer
SFX A er e/HIJQ [er]maner
SFX A er e/HIJQ [kps]òrxer
SFX A er e/HIJQ [luèò]der
SFX A er e/HIJQ [lè]xer
SFX A er e/HIJQ [rtxđ]èmer
SFX A er e/HIJQ [rèò]ter
SFX A er e/HIJQ [sx]òlver
SFX A er e/HIJQ [èò]rder
SFX A er e/HIJQ [èò]ñer
SFX A er e/HIJQ abòrer
SFX A er e/HIJQ espèler
SFX A er e/HIJQ koñer
SFX A er e/HIJQ kòxer
SFX A er e/HIJQ lèđer
SFX A er e/HIJQ lđer
SFX A er e/HIJQ mòjer
SFX A er e/HIJQ mòver
SFX A er e/HIJQ nòxer
SFX A er e/HIJQ parer
SFX A er e/HIJQ piòver
SFX A er e/HIJQ rver
SFX A er e/HIJQ rđer
SFX A er e/HIJQ soler
SFX A er e/HIJQ sòrber
SFX A er e/HIJQ tèser
SFX A er e/HIJQ valer
SFX A er e/HIJQ xlièđer
SFX A er e/HIJQ òser
SFX A er e/HIJQ ŧèrner
SFX A er e/IJQ sèguer
SFX A er e/IQ tràer
SFX A er e/J estínguer
SFX A er e/J saer
SFX A er en/K [ao]er
SFX A er en/K [ao]ler
SFX A er en/K [er]maner
SFX A er en/K aver
SFX A er en/K koñer
SFX A er en/K parer
SFX A er en/K poder
SFX A er ene/K [ao]er
SFX A er ene/K [ao]ler
SFX A er ene/K [er]maner
SFX A er ene/K aver
SFX A er ene/K koñer
SFX A er ene/K parer
SFX A er ene/K poder
SFX A er ense/K [ao]er
SFX A er ense/K [ao]ler
SFX A er ense/K [er]maner
SFX A er ense/K aver
SFX A er ense/K koñer
SFX A er ense/K parer
SFX A er ense/K poder
SFX A er ga tràer
SFX A er gi tràer
SFX A er i/EG [ar]ner
SFX A er i/EG [aè]ler
SFX A er i/EG [aò]rer
SFX A er i/EG [ctv]èñer
SFX A er i/EG [km]òjer
SFX A er i/EG [lrè]đer
SFX A er i/EG [lrò]ver
SFX A er i/EG [lèò]xer
SFX A er i/EG [oò]ñer
SFX A er i/EGM [kps]òrxer
SFX A er i/EGM [luèò]der
SFX A er i/EGM [rtxđ]èmer
SFX A er i/EGM [rèò]ter
SFX A er i/EGM [èò]rder
SFX A er i/EGM soler
SFX A er i/EGM sèguer
SFX A er i/EGM sòrber
SFX A er i/EGM tràer
SFX A er i/EGM tèser
SFX A er i/EGM òser
SFX A er i/M [ar]kòjer
SFX A er i/M [er]maner
SFX A er i/M [lè]xer
SFX A er i/M [sx]òlver
SFX A er i/M [èò]ñer
SFX A er i/M abòrer
SFX A er i/M espèler
SFX A er i/M koñer
SFX A er i/M kòxer
SFX A er i/M lèđer
SFX A er i/M lđer
SFX A er i/M mòjer
SFX A er i/M mòver
SFX A er i/M nòxer
SFX A er i/M parer
SFX A er i/M piòver
SFX A er i/M rver
SFX A er i/M rđer
SFX A er i/M valer
SFX A er i/M xlièđer
SFX A er i/M ŧèrner
SFX A er imo/K [ao]er
SFX A er imo/K [ao]ler
SFX A er imo/K [er]maner
SFX A er imo/K aver
SFX A er imo/K koñer
SFX A er imo/K parer
SFX A er imo/K poder
SFX A er imoi/L [ao]er
SFX A er imoi/L [ao]ler
SFX A er imoi/L [er]maner
SFX A er imoi/L aver
SFX A er imoi/L koñer
SFX A er imoi/L parer
SFX A er imoi/L poder
SFX A er ion/K [ao]er
SFX A er ion/K [ao]ler
SFX A er ion/K [er]maner
SFX A er ion/K aver
SFX A er ion/K parer
SFX A er ion/K poder
SFX A er ione/K [ao]er
SFX A er ione/K [ao]ler
SFX A er ione/K [er]maner
SFX A er ione/K aver
SFX A er ione/K parer
SFX A er ione/K poder
SFX A er ionse/K [ao]er
SFX A er ionse/K [ao]ler
SFX A er ionse/K [er]maner
SFX A er ionse/K aver
SFX A er ionse/K parer
SFX A er ionse/K poder
SFX A er isen/K [ao]er
SFX A er isen/K [ao]ler
SFX A er isen/K [er]maner
SFX A er isen/K aver
SFX A er isen/K koñer
SFX A er isen/K parer
SFX A er isen/K poder
SFX A er isene/K [ao]er
SFX A er isene/K [ao]ler
SFX A er isene/K [er]maner
SFX A er isene/K aver
SFX A er isene/K koñer
SFX A er isene/K parer
SFX A er isene/K poder
SFX A er isense/K [ao]er
SFX A er isense/K [ao]ler
SFX A er isense/K [er]maner
SFX A er isense/K aver
SFX A er isense/K koñer
SFX A er isense/K parer
SFX A er isense/K poder
SFX A er ision/K [ao]er
SFX A er ision/K [ao]ler
SFX A er ision/K [er]maner
SFX A er ision/K aver
SFX A er ision/K koñer
SFX A er ision/K parer
SFX A er ision/K poder
SFX A er isione/K [ao]er
SFX A er isione/K [ao]ler
SFX A er isione/K [er]maner
SFX A er isione/K aver
SFX A er isione/K koñer
SFX A er isione/K parer
SFX A er isione/K poder
SFX A er isionse/K [ao]er
SFX A er isionse/K [ao]ler
SFX A er isionse/K [er]maner
SFX A er isionse/K aver
SFX A er isionse/K koñer
SFX A er isionse/K parer
SFX A er isionse/K poder
SFX A er ison/K [ao]er
SFX A er ison/K [ao]ler
SFX A er ison/K [er]maner
SFX A er ison/K aver
SFX A er ison/K koñer
SFX A er ison/K parer
SFX A er ison/K poder
SFX A er isone/K [ao]er
SFX A er isone/K [ao]ler
SFX A er isone/K [er]maner
SFX A er isone/K aver
SFX A er isone/K koñer
SFX A er isone/K parer
SFX A er isone/K poder
SFX A er isonse/K [ao]er
SFX A er isonse/K [ao]ler
SFX A er isonse/K [er]maner
SFX A er isonse/K aver
SFX A er isonse/K koñer
SFX A er isonse/K parer
SFX A er isonse/K poder
SFX A er itu/N [ar]kòjer
SFX A er itu/N [bŧ]éver
SFX A er itu/N [cflprtvŧ]énder
SFX A er itu/N [cj]ànxer
SFX A er itu/N [csŧ]éder
SFX A er itu/N [ct]éñer
SFX A er itu/N [ek]lúder
SFX A er itu/N [en]xíjer
SFX A er itu/N [fklr]úxer
SFX A er itu/N [fpt]énxer
SFX A er itu/N [ikr]ànđer
SFX A er itu/N [ir]éser
SFX A er itu/N [kps]òrxer
SFX A er itu/N [kruv]àder
SFX A er itu/N [lptŧ]énđer
SFX A er itu/N [lr]íxer
SFX A er itu/N [luèò]der
SFX A er itu/N [lè]xer
SFX A er itu/N [mn]éter
SFX A er itu/N [mpđ]ónxer
SFX A er itu/N [no]kónber
SFX A er itu/N [ns]pónder
SFX A er itu/N [nñ]óser
SFX A er itu/N [rt]àxer
SFX A er itu/N [rtxđ]èmer
SFX A er itu/N [rvŧ]íder
SFX A er itu/N [rèò]ter
SFX A er itu/N [sx]íster
SFX A er itu/N [sx]òlver
SFX A er itu/N [sx]úmer
SFX A er itu/N [èò]rder
SFX A er itu/N [èò]ñer
SFX A er itu/N abòrer
SFX A er itu/N asénter
SFX A er itu/N bàter
SFX A er itu/N bójer
SFX A er itu/N déver
SFX A er itu/N díxer
SFX A er itu/N dúxer
SFX A er itu/N espèler
SFX A er itu/N estínguer
SFX A er itu/N exímer
SFX A er itu/N fríđer
SFX A er itu/N fínxer
SFX A er itu/N fónder
SFX A er itu/N infóter
SFX A er itu/N kréder
SFX A er itu/N kòxer
SFX A er itu/N kórer
SFX A er itu/N lèđer
SFX A er itu/N lđer
SFX A er itu/N mòjer
SFX A er itu/N mòver
SFX A er itu/N nàser
SFX A er itu/N nòxer
SFX A er itu/N piàxer
SFX A er itu/N piòver
SFX A er itu/N pànder
SFX A er itu/N póner
SFX A er itu/N reprímer
SFX A er itu/N romàñer
SFX A er itu/N rver
SFX A er itu/N rónper
SFX A er itu/N rđer
SFX A er itu/N skríver
SFX A er itu/N skónder
SFX A er itu/N spàrxer
SFX A er itu/N strénđer
SFX A er itu/N sèguer
SFX A er itu/N sòrber
SFX A er itu/N tràer
SFX A er itu/N tèser
SFX A er itu/N véder
SFX A er itu/N vénŧer
SFX A er itu/N vínŧer
SFX A er itu/N víver
SFX A er itu/N xgrénđer
SFX A er itu/N xlièđer
SFX A er itu/N xàser
SFX A er itu/N xàŧer
SFX A er itu/N àrder
SFX A er itu/N òser
SFX A er itu/N ónđer
SFX A er itu/N ŧèrner
SFX A er iven/K [ao]er
SFX A er iven/K [ao]ler
SFX A er iven/K [er]maner
SFX A er iven/K aver
SFX A er iven/K koñer
SFX A er iven/K parer
SFX A er iven/K poder
SFX A er ivense/K [ao]er
SFX A er ivense/K [ao]ler
SFX A er ivense/K [er]maner
SFX A er ivense/K aver
SFX A er ivense/K koñer
SFX A er ivense/K parer
SFX A er ivense/K poder
SFX A er ivion/K [ao]er
SFX A er ivion/K [ao]ler
SFX A er ivion/K [er]maner
SFX A er ivion/K aver
SFX A er ivion/K koñer
