public_html/app/tools/lang/morphology/dictionaries/vec.dic
inagrir/A
albiđar/A
inalokar/A
dexinamorar/A
dexanemar/A
arar/A
arđinar/A
arsar/A
subastar/A
aŧetar/A
exautorar/A
inaxiar/A
badinar/A
xbajar/A
inbakukar/A
inbalbar/A
xbalonar/A
rebaltar/A
dexbandir/A
banketar/A
barakar/A
inbarboɉar/A
inbarlukar/A
xbasar/A
inbàter/A
xbatocar/A
dexbautar/A
baxar/A
bekar/A
dexbendar/A
xberlúxer/A
béver/A
bexoñar/A
biastemar/A
xbilanŧar/A
dexbingolar/A
sobisar/A
bixar/A
bocar/A
strabóɉer/A
trabokar/A
rebolar/A
xbolŧar/A
bonbardar/A
borir/A
xbordelar/A
xbosegar/A
xbotegar/A
inboŧar/A
bragar/A
bragolar/A
inbrankar/A
abraŧar/A
inbrenar/A
inbrijar/A
xbroacar/A
inbroɉar/A
bronbar/A
inbrular/A
bruskinar/A
rabufar/A
buskar/A
inbutirar/A
xbuxinar/A
descapar/A
scatar/A
cekolar/A
inkoncèñer/A
acéñer/A
soscéñer/A
ciɉar/A
incodar/A
cucar/A
interdir/A
kondanar/A
defamar/A
dentelar/A
determinar/A
dexnodar/A
distribuir/A
redíxer/A
dolar/A
indomar/A
pardonar/A
adorar/A
adosar/A
xdrelar/A
dulkorar/A
redúxer/A
đavajar/A
đogatolar/A
rađónxer/A
đugatolar/A
èser/A
reelèđer/A
subentrar/A
adeskar/A
exaɉerar/A
exerŧitar/A
desfar/A
sorafar/A
fadegar/A
infaldar/A
falivar/A
fanfuñar/A
faoređar/A
infatir/A
infaŧendar/A
scarifegar/A
onfegar/A
speŧifegar/A
defenir/A
infenocar/A
preferir/A
konfermar/A
dexenfetar/A
fiabar/A
fiankonar/A
desfibiar/A
resfidar/A
fikar/A
trafilar/A
skonfinar/A
fiondar/A
infirmar/A
fiskaliđar/A
infiubar/A
sfoderar/A
desfogonar/A
sfoɉar/A
fónder/A
trasforar/A
informar/A
formigolar/A
renforŧar/A
fradelar/A
afrankar/A
sfrànđer/A
infraskonar/A
sfraŧelar/A
fregar/A
sfrexar/A
fritolar/A
konfrontar/A
frustar/A
refuɉar/A
infuriar/A
galar/A
dexganasar/A
garbelar/A
xgarxar/A
xginŧar/A
xgonbrar/A
dexgradir/A
dexgrandenar/A
kongratular/A
ingrejar/A
ingrinŧar/A
grongolar/A
guantar/A
xguatarar/A
reguxar/A
industriar/A
inpaxar/A
interesar/A
iritar/A
xɉanŧar/A
reɉetar/A
kabalar/A
skagaŧar/A
rekalkar/A
kalŧinar/A
skanelar/A
kanpar/A
skanŧelar/A
kapocar/A
skaregar/A
inkarolar/A
inskartoŧar/A
katar/A
skatonar/A
rekavar/A
inkaxonar/A
kogolar/A
kolar/A
rekoltar/A
deskonir/A
koniar/A
kontar/A
rekonŧar/A
inkórer/A
skordar/A
inkorporar/A
koŧar/A
rekréder/A
skrikolar/A
krostolar/A
skuajar/A
kuerelar/A
rekular/A
kurioxar/A
lamentar/A
lapiar/A
xlaŧar/A
xlekiñar/A
leterar/A
skuilibrar/A
interlinear/A
interlokuir/A
aloŧar/A
lusar/A
xmafarar/A
xmaliŧiar/A
manetar/A
mañatar/A
mariđar/A
maselar/A
xmatiđar/A
maxerar/A
xmemorar/A
xmenuir/A
améter/A
traxméter/A
diminuir/A
xmogar/A
moltonar/A
xmontar/A
demòrder/A
mostrar/A
mucegarar/A
murar/A
inmutriar/A
xnaturar/A
xnervađar/A
noɉar/A
nudrir/A
dexobedir/A
inokular/A
ondiđar/A
ordenar/A
ortrigar/A
spacarar/A
despajar/A
paleŧar/A
inpanar/A
spapar/A
skonparir/A
spartir/A
paskolar/A
patentar/A
spavejar/A
spegaŧar/A
spelumar/A
penelar/A
despeocar/A
inperletar/A
inpetir/A
despetrir/A
inpiantar/A
despiegar/A
inpinir/A
inpirar/A
spiumar/A
konplikar/A
despolverar/A
kontrapóner/A
pontar/A
spónxer/A
trasportar/A
ipotegar/A
prénder/A
raprexentar/A
apropiar/A
puñalar/A
puxar/A
iraixar/A
rankurar/A
ratinar/A
rekuiđir/A
restelar/A
riscar/A
ròder/A
roinar/A
roñir/A
roxegar/A
ruñir/A
saganar/A
strasalir/A
salvar/A
sarkiar/A
scantiđar/A
sekir/A
sèguer/A
deskonseɉar/A
insenpiar/A
inseñorar/A
asestar/A
sialakuar/A
simular/A
sixilar/A
skarabocar/A
skaturir/A
skivar/A
skriturar/A
soaŧar/A
soletar/A
sonetar/A
resòrxer/A
spatolar/A
isperonar/A
spigolar/A
resplénder/A
spuar/A
stafilar/A
stañar/A
sterŧar/A
instituir/A
stornir/A
straŧar/A
istromentar/A
destuar/A
suàder/A
sumariar/A
insutilir/A
staɉuŧar/A
tanaɉar/A
retardar/A
tasteɉar/A
telefonar/A
inténđer/A
retentar/A
reteñir/A
apartéñer/A
terapienar/A
testemoniar/A
tiraneɉar/A
tonar/A
torbiar/A
tòrđer/A
detràer/A
tragar/A
destrasinar/A
estràxer/A
tridar/A
destronar/A
truŧidar/A
inŧangolar/A
ŧefar/A
inŧeregar/A
ŧianŧar/A
ŧiñar/A
ŧolar/A
inumidir/A
evàder/A
stravanir/A
varentar/A
stravéder/A
xvelixar/A
xventrar/A
soveñir/A
reverir/A
xvernar/A
dexverxenar/A
deviar/A
vinkolar/A
víver/A
avokar/A
involtolar/A
vulnerar/A
xbaratar/A
xèmer/A
arxiñar/A
xmincar/A
rexultar/A
